California, session 20252026, AB2497.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2601 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2601. For the purpose of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise specified:(a) “Board” means the Physical Therapy Board of California.(b) “Movement system” means the collection of all bodily systems that interact to move the body or its parts. (c) “Physical therapist” or “physiotherapist” means a health care professional who is licensed pursuant to this chapter to practice physical therapy on a person. A physical therapist is part of the primary care team who works in a variety of settings to help improve function of the movement system.(d) “Physical therapist assistant” or “physical therapy assistant” means a person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter to assist a physical therapist in the provision of physical therapy.(e) “Physical therapist technician” and “physical therapy aide,” as described in Section 2630.4, shall be deemed identical and interchangeable terms.(f) “Physical therapy” or “physiotherapy” means services specified in Section 2620 that are provided as follows:(1) By or under the direction and supervision of a physical therapist.(2) To assess and facilitate motion, force, energy, and motor control through the use of the physical, chemical, and other properties of heat, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, movement, and active, passive, and resistive exercise to maximize health, well-being, function, and community participation across the diversity of age, sex, gender, culture, environment, and psychosocial and socioeconomic status.(3) For prevention, habilitation, rehabilitation, promotion of health and well-being of bodily and mental conditions, disease or movement-based impairments, activity limitations, and participation restrictions.SEC. 2. Section 2620 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 2620 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2620. (a) The practice of physical therapy includes all of the following services:(1) Examination and evaluation evaluation, using clinically appropriate methods, of the movement system and the system’s relation to health-related and disabling conditions, including a review of systems and medication regimen to identify developmental, mechanical, physiological, and biopsychosocial impairments of the movement system, participation restrictions, or other conditions to determine diagnosis of conditions of the movement system, prognosis, and intervention, and assess outcomes.(2) The design, implementation, and modification of interventions to alleviate impairments, functional limitations, and participation restrictions related to the movement system or other health-related conditions.(3) Furnishing, ordering, fabrication, and application of assistive, adaptive, orthotic, prosthetic, protective, and supportive devices and equipment consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 4023, subdivision (g) of Section 4059, and subdivision (d) of Section 4059.5.(b) Physical therapy interventions techniques and procedures may include, but are not limited to, therapeutic exercise; gait training; functional training; self-care; training in self-care and in-home, community, or work integration or reintegration; manual therapy, including soft tissue mobilization, mobilization and joint mobilization or manipulation, and intramuscular manual therapy; manipulation; therapeutic massage; lymphatic drainage; neuromuscular reeducation; blood flow restriction; pulmonary management and airway clearance; integumentary protection and active repair; biophysical agents or modalities, including electrical, sound, light, mechanical, electromagnetic, or thermal; movement system counseling and education; nutritional education and counseling; and pain and stress management.(1) Prevention or reduction of risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation, and disability, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health, and wellness.(2) Administration, consultation, education, and research.(3) Referring for other indicated services and tests for consultation with other providers, decisionmaking, and patient management.SEC. 4. Section 2620.1 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 2620.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2620.1. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a referral or prior authorization for a patient to directly access physical therapist services.(b) A physical therapist shall refer a patient to a physician and surgeon or other appropriately licensed health care provider when the situation or condition of the patient is beyond the scope of the education and training of the physical therapist.SEC. 6. Section 2620.5 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 2620.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2620.5. The practice of physical therapy includes the use of electrode needles to perform tissue penetration for the purpose of evaluating and interpreting performance of the neuromusculoskeletal system.SEC. 8. Section 2622 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2622. (a) A physical therapist shall be responsible for managing all aspects of the care of each patient as set forth in regulations promulgated by the board.(b) A physical therapist shall not supervise more than three physical therapist assistants at one time to assist the physical therapist in their practice of physical therapy.(c) A physical therapist may utilize the services of one aide engaged in patient-related tasks to aid the physical therapist in their practice of physical therapy.SEC. 9. Section 2633 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2633. (a) A person holding a license as a physical therapist issued by the board may use the title “physical therapist” or the letters “P.T.,” the title “doctor of physical therapy” or, subject to subdivision (b), the letters “D.P.T.,” or any other words, letters, or figures that indicate that the person using them is a licensed physical therapist. No other person shall be designated or use the term licensed or registered physical therapist, licensed or registered physiotherapist, licensed or registered physical therapy technician, or the letters “P.T.,” “D.P.T.,” “L.P.T.,” or “R.P.T.,” or any other words, abbreviation, or insignia implying that physical therapy is provided unless those services are provided by or under the direction of a licensed physical therapist. A person or business shall not advertise or otherwise promote a person as being a physical therapist or physiotherapist unless the individual is a licensed physical therapist. A person or business that offers, provides, or bills any person for services shall not characterize those services as physical therapy unless the person performing the service is a licensed physical therapist.(b) A licensed physical therapist who has received a doctoral degree in physical therapy or, subject to subdivision (d), a doctoral degree in a related health science, may do the following:(1) In a written communication, use the initials DPT, PhD, DSc, or EdD, as applicable, following the licensee’s name.(2) In a written communication, use the title “Doctor” or the abbreviation “Dr.” preceding the licensee’s name, if the licensee’s name is immediately followed by an unabbreviated specification of the applicable doctoral degree held by the licensee.(3) In a spoken communication while engaged in the practice of physical therapy, use the title “doctor” preceding the person’s name, if the speaker specifies that they are a physical therapist.(c) A doctoral degree described in subdivision (b) shall be granted by an institution accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or by an accrediting agency recognized by the National Commission on Accrediting or the United States Department of Education that the board determines is equivalent to the Western Association of Schools and Colleges.(d) For purposes of subdivision (b), the doctoral degrees that are in a related health science shall be those specified by the board in regulation.SEC. 10. Section 2689 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 11. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.